src/morphology/incoming/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON u-OPT-0-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ųų    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uu    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@uu    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@uu    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uu #;

LEXICON u-OPT-0-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ųų    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uu    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@uu    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@uu    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uu #;

LEXICON u-OPT-D-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ush    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@un    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ut    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ut    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ut    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ut #;

LEXICON u-OPT-D-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ush    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@un    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ut    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ut    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ut    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ut #;

LEXICON u-OPT-D-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@'ush    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@'un    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@'ut    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ut    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@'at    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ut    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ut #;

LEXICON u-OPT-H-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ok    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ųh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@uh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@uh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uh #;

LEXICON u-OPT-H-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ok    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ųh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@uh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ah    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@uh    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@uh #;

LEXICON u-OPT-L-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ogn    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ųl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ul    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ul    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ul    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ul #;

LEXICON u-OPT-L-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ogn    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ųl    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ul    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ul    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@al    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ul    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ul #;
